translate/lexd/pron.lexd
LEXICON RuLemmasPron
мāш<pron>:мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
мāшен<pron>:мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
маш<pron>:мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
машен<pron>:мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
мāш<pron>:мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
мāшен<pron>:мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
маш<pron>:мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
машен<pron>:мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
мāш<pron>:мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
мāшен<pron>:мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
маш<pron>:мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
машен<pron>:мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
азор-тао<pron>:всякое<pron>
азор-таҳо<pron>:всякое<pron>
амдигар<pron>:взаимно<pron>
ар<pron>:каждый<pron>
арамард<pron>:тем<pron>
арамирд<pron>:тем<pron>
арумард<pron>:тем<pron>
к-арамард<pron>:тем<pron>
к-арамирд<pron>:тем<pron>
к-арумард<pron>:тем<pron>
а-редри<pron>:тем<pron>
а-редрид<pron>:тем<pron>
аредард<pron>:тем<pron>
аредирд<pron>:тем<pron>
аредра<pron>:тем<pron>
к-а-редри<pron>:тем<pron>
к-а-редрид<pron>:тем<pron>
к-аредард<pron>:тем<pron>
к-аредирд<pron>:тем<pron>
к-аредра<pron>:тем<pron>
а-рāнғāҷ<pron>:какой_ни<pron>
а-рāнғāҷ-аθ<pron>:какой_ни<pron>
а-ранғāҷ<pron>:какой_ни<pron>
а-ранғāҷ-аθ<pron>:какой_ни<pron>
ар-рāнғāҷ<pron>:какой_ни<pron>
ар-рāнғāҷ-аθ<pron>:какой_ни<pron>
ар-ранғāҷ<pron>:какой_ни<pron>
ар-ранғāҷ-аθ<pron>:какой_ни<pron>
а-рāнг-ца<pron>:чтото<pron>
а-ранг-ца<pron>:чтото<pron>
ар-рāнг-ца<pron>:чтото<pron>
ар-ранг-ца<pron>:чтото<pron>
ар-тāм<pron>:каждый<pron>
ар-тāн<pron>:каждый<pron>
ар-цу̊н<pron>:все<pron>
ар-цу̊нд<pron>:все<pron>
ар-чāй<pron>:каждый<pron>
ар-чê<pron>:косв_к_арчй<pron>
ар-чи<pron>:косв_к_арчй<pron>
ар-чӣ<pron>:косв_к_арчй<pron>
ар-чиду̊м<pron>:любой<pron>
ар-чӣз<pron>:коечто<pron>
ар-чӣзин<pron>:какой_угодно<pron>
ач<pron>:разве<pron>
ача<pron>:вовсе<pron>
ачаθ<pron>:вовсе<pron>
ачча<pron>:вовсе<pron>
аччаθ<pron>:вовсе<pron>
бāзе<pron>:некоторые<pron>
бāзи<pron>:некоторые<pron>
бêмадуни<pron>:такойто<pron>
бемаду̊ни<pron>:такойто<pron>
wам<pron>:ее_и_т_п<pron>
wим<pron>:ее_и_т_п<pron>
wам<pron>:ее<pron>
wим<pron>:ее<pron>
wам<pron>:ту<pron>
wим<pron>:ту<pron>
wам<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
wим<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
wā<pron>:прямая_форма_указ_мест_дальн_ст_мн_ч<pron>
wāδ<pron>:прямая_форма_указ_мест_дальн_ст_мн_ч<pron>
wāδен<pron>:прямая_форма_указ_мест_дальн_ст_мн_ч<pron>
wā<pron>:те<pron>
wāδ<pron>:те<pron>
wāδен<pron>:те<pron>
wā<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
wāδ<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
wāδен<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
wе<pron>:косв_форма_мн_ч_указ_мест_дальн_ст_к_прямой_форме_w_них_и_т_п<pron>
wев<pron>:косв_форма_мн_ч_указ_мест_дальн_ст_к_прямой_форме_w_них_и_т_п<pron>
wевен<pron>:косв_форма_мн_ч_указ_мест_дальн_ст_к_прямой_форме_w_них_и_т_п<pron>
wеф<pron>:косв_форма_мн_ч_указ_мест_дальн_ст_к_прямой_форме_w_них_и_т_п<pron>
wе<pron>:их<pron>
wев<pron>:их<pron>
wевен<pron>:их<pron>
wеф<pron>:их<pron>
wе<pron>:тех<pron>
wев<pron>:тех<pron>
wевен<pron>:тех<pron>
wеф<pron>:тех<pron>
wе<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
wев<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
wевен<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
wеф<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
wê-<pron>:косв_форма_указ_мест_дальн_ст_муж_р_к_прямой_форме_йу_и_т_п<pron>
wи<pron>:косв_форма_указ_мест_дальн_ст_муж_р_к_прямой_форме_йу_и_т_п<pron>
wӣ-<pron>:косв_форма_указ_мест_дальн_ст_муж_р_к_прямой_форме_йу_и_т_п<pron>
wê-<pron>:его<pron>
wи<pron>:его<pron>
wӣ-<pron>:его<pron>
wê-<pron>:того<pron>
wи<pron>:того<pron>
wӣ-<pron>:того<pron>
wê-<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
wи<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
wӣ-<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
дам<pron>:косв_форма_указ_личн_мест_ж_р_средн_ст_удаления_к_прямой_форме_йид<pron>
дим<pron>:косв_форма_указ_личн_мест_ж_р_средн_ст_удаления_к_прямой_форме_йид<pron>
дам<pron>:ее_и_т_п<pron>
дим<pron>:ее_и_т_п<pron>
дам<pron>:ее<pron>
дим<pron>:ее<pron>
дам<pron>:ту_и_т_п<pron>
дим<pron>:ту_и_т_п<pron>
дам<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
дим<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
дā<pron>:они<pron>
дāδ<pron>:они<pron>
дā<pron>:те<pron>
дāδ<pron>:те<pron>
дā<pron>:адъективно_в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
дāδ<pron>:адъективно_в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
дев<pron>:косв_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_мн_ч_средн_ст_удаления_к_прямой_форме_д<pron>
девен<pron>:косв_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_мн_ч_средн_ст_удаления_к_прямой_форме_д<pron>
деф<pron>:косв_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_мн_ч_средн_ст_удаления_к_прямой_форме_д<pron>
дефен<pron>:косв_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_мн_ч_средн_ст_удаления_к_прямой_форме_д<pron>
дев<pron>:вторичное_мн_девен<pron>
девен<pron>:вторичное_мн_девен<pron>
деф<pron>:вторичное_мн_девен<pron>
дефен<pron>:вторичное_мн_девен<pron>
дев<pron>:их<pron>
девен<pron>:их<pron>
деф<pron>:их<pron>
дефен<pron>:их<pron>
дев<pron>:тех<pron>
девен<pron>:тех<pron>
деф<pron>:тех<pron>
дефен<pron>:тех<pron>
дев<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
девен<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
деф<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
дефен<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
дигар-га<pron>:другой<pron>
дигар-гад<pron>:другой<pron>
дигар-ги<pron>:другой<pron>
дигар-гид<pron>:другой<pron>
дис<pron>:такой<pron>
ик-дис<pron>:такой<pron>
дисāҷ<pron>:такой<pron>
ду̊н<pron>:такой<pron>
ду̊нд<pron>:такой<pron>
ик-ду̊н<pron>:такой<pron>
ик-ду̊нд<pron>:такой<pron>
идик<pron>:уменьшласк_к_йид<pron>
ич<pron>:ничто<pron>
йич<pron>:ничто<pron>
йака-чӣн<pron>:все_до_одного<pron>
акдигар<pron>:друг_друга<pron>
йакдигар<pron>:друг_друга<pron>
ик-ам<pron>:этот<pron>
ик-амик<pron>:этот<pron>
йам<pron>:этот<pron>
йамик<pron>:этот<pron>
к-ам<pron>:этот<pron>
к-амик<pron>:этот<pron>
ик-ам<pron>:этот<pron>
ик-амик<pron>:этот<pron>
йам<pron>:этот<pron>
йамик<pron>:этот<pron>
к-ам<pron>:этот<pron>
к-амик<pron>:этот<pron>
йā<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_ж_дальн_ст<pron>
йик-ā<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_ж_дальн_ст<pron>
йикк-ā<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_ж_дальн_ст<pron>
к-ā<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_ж_дальн_ст<pron>
йи<pron>:в_знач_местоимения_при_противопоставлении<pron>
идик<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
ик-ид<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
икк-ид<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
йид<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
йидик<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
к-ид<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
идик<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
ик-ид<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
икк-ид<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
йид<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
йидик<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
к-ид<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_средн_ст<pron>
йи-рāнг<pron>:чтонибудь<pron>
йи-ранг<pron>:чтонибудь<pron>
йи-рāнг<pron>:ничто<pron>
йи-ранг<pron>:ничто<pron>
йи-рāнг-аθ<pron>:какнибудь<pron>
йи-ранг-аθ<pron>:какнибудь<pron>
йи-рāнг-аθ<pron>:ничто<pron>
йи-ранг-аθ<pron>:ничто<pron>
и-ца<pron>:чтонибудь<pron>
йи-ца<pron>:чтонибудь<pron>
йи-цав<pron>:чтонибудь<pron>
и-ца<pron>:ничто<pron>
йи-ца<pron>:ничто<pron>
йи-цав<pron>:ничто<pron>
йи-чāй<pron>:ктонибудь<pron>
йи-чāй<pron>:никто<pron>
йи-чê-<pron>:когол<pron>
йи-чи<pron>:когол<pron>
йи-чӣ-<pron>:когол<pron>
йи-чê-<pron>:никого<pron>
йи-чи<pron>:никого<pron>
йи-чӣ-<pron>:никого<pron>
и-чӣз<pron>:нечто<pron>
йи-чӣз<pron>:нечто<pron>
и-чӣз<pron>:ничто<pron>
йи-чӣз<pron>:ничто<pron>
и-чӣз<pron>:какойл<pron>
йи-чӣз<pron>:какойл<pron>
йи-чӣзаθ<pron>:ничто<pron>
йӣw<pron>:в_значении_субстантивного_местоимения_при_противопоставлении<pron>
йӣwик<pron>:в_значении_субстантивного_местоимения_при_противопоставлении<pron>
йӣwӣк-аθ<pron>:в_значении_субстантивного_местоимения_при_противопоставлении<pron>
ик-о-<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
ик-у<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
икк-у<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
йо-<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
йу<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
к-о-<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
к-у<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
ик-о-<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
ик-у<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
икк-у<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
йо-<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
йу<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
к-о-<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
к-у<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
ик-о-<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
ик-у<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
икк-у<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
йо-<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
йу<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
к-о-<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
к-у<pron>:прямая_форма_указательноличного_местоимения_дальн_ст_м_р<pron>
к-ам<pron>:вариант_указательного_местоимения_йам_с_усилительной_частицей<pron>
кāҷа<pron>:куда<pron>
кāҷад<pron>:куда<pron>
кāҷао<pron>:куда<pron>
кāҷаҳо<pron>:куда<pron>
кāҷи<pron>:куда<pron>
кāҷид<pron>:куда<pron>
кāҷо<pron>:куда<pron>
кāҷуо<pron>:куда<pron>
кāҷуҳ<pron>:куда<pron>
кāҷуҳо<pron>:куда<pron>
кочор<pron>:то_самое<pron>
кулаθ<pron>:все<pron>
кулаки<pron>:все<pron>
куллаθ<pron>:все<pron>
куллаки<pron>:все<pron>
кули<pron>:весь<pron>
кулли<pron>:весь<pron>
мам<pron>:косв_форма_указ_мест<pron>
мим<pron>:косв_форма_указ_мест<pron>
мам<pron>:личн_мест_ее_и_т_п<pron>
мим<pron>:личн_мест_ее_и_т_п<pron>
мам<pron>:притяж_мест<pron>
мим<pron>:притяж_мест<pron>
мам<pron>:в_собственно_указательном_значении_эту<pron>
мим<pron>:в_собственно_указательном_значении_эту<pron>
мам<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
мим<pron>:в_ослабленном_указательном_значении_в_роли_определенного_артикля<pron>
мā<pron>:прямая_форма_указательного_местоимения_мн_ч_ближн_ст<pron>
мāδ<pron>:прямая_форма_указательного_местоимения_мн_ч_ближн_ст<pron>
мāδен<pron>:прямая_форма_указательного_местоимения_мн_ч_ближн_ст<pron>
ме<pron>:их<pron>
мев<pron>:их<pron>
мевен<pron>:их<pron>
меф<pron>:их<pron>
мефен<pron>:их<pron>
мê-<pron>:его_и_тп<pron>
ми<pron>:его_и_тп<pron>
мӣ-<pron>:его_и_тп<pron>
падамард<pron>:тем<pron>
падамирд<pron>:тем<pron>
падумард<pron>:тем<pron>
падумирд<pron>:тем<pron>
сари<pron>:каждый<pron>
там-<pron>:личное_мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
тамā-<pron>:личное_мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
тама<pron>:личное_мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
тамайен<pron>:личное_мест_го_л_мн_ч<pron>
таму̊м<pron>:весь<pron>
то-<pron>:употребляется_субстантивно<pron>
ту<pron>:употребляется_субстантивно<pron>
тӯ-<pron>:употребляется_субстантивно<pron>
фук<pron>:весь<pron>
фука<pron>:все<pron>
